Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF395.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [168.1257] ARMED FORCES VETERAN SPECIAL PLATES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin General requirements and procedures. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding section 168.1293, the commissioner shall issue a set of special veterans' plates or a single motorcycle plate to an applicant who: new text end new text begin (1) is a veteran, as defined in section 197.447; new text end new text begin (2) does not meet the criteria for veterans' special plates under section 168.123, subdivision 2; new text end new text begin (3) is a registered owner of a passenger automobile as defined in section 168.002, subdivision 24; recreational vehicle as defined in section 168.002, subdivision 27; one-ton pickup truck as defined in section 168.002, subdivision 21b; or motorcycle as defined in section 168.002, subdivision 19; new text end new text begin (4) pays a fee in the amount specified for special plates under section 168.12, subdivision 5, for each set of plates and any other fees required by this chapter; new text end new text begin (5) pays the registration tax required under section 168.013; and new text end new text begin (6) complies with this chapter and rules governing the registration of motor vehicles and licensing of drivers. new text end new text begin (b) The applicant must have a certified copy of the applicant's discharge papers, indicating character of discharge, at the time of application. If an applicant served in active military service in a branch of the armed forces of a nation or society allied with the United States in conducting a foreign war and is unable to obtain a record of that service and discharge status, the commissioner of veterans affairs may certify the applicant as qualified for the veterans' plates provided under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Motorcycle plate. new text end new text begin A motorcycle plate issued under this section must be the same size as a regular motorcycle plate. The commissioner shall only issue one motorcycle plate for a motorcycle registered under subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Design. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this subdivision, "branch of the armed forces" means the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Coast Guard, Merchant Marine of the United States, and all other uniformed services as defined in United States Code, title 52, section 20310. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of public safety, in consultation with the commissioner of veterans affairs, must issue a special veterans' plate for each branch of the armed forces. The special plate must bear an inscription "VETERAN" at the bottom of the plate and include a special emblem of the branch of the armed forces. The commissioner of veterans affairs shall design, subject to the approval of the commissioner of public safety, the special emblem for each branch of the armed forces used for the veterans' special plates. The commissioner of public safety shall consult with veterans organizations from each branch of the armed forces on the design of the branch's special veterans' plate. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Plate transfers. new text end new text begin On application to the commissioner and payment of a transfer fee of $5, special plates issued under this section may be transferred to another motor vehicle if the subsequent vehicle is: new text end new text begin (1) qualified under subdivision 1, clause (3); and new text end new text begin (2) registered to the same individual to whom the special plates were originally issued. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Fees. new text end new text begin The fees collected under this section must be deposited in the driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705. Except for the fees paid under subdivision 1, the commissioner must issue a set of special veterans' plates, or a single plate for a motorcycle, to an eligible person free of charge and shall replace the plate or plates without charge if they become damaged. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Costs of production. new text end new text begin The commissioner of management and budget may transfer money in the "Support Our Troops" account under section 190.19, subdivision 2a, to the driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705, subdivision 1, to pay for the cost of production of the license plates authorized under this section. The commissioner of veterans affairs and the commissioner of public safety must agree on a payment schedule before any money may be transferred under this subdivision. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026, for armed forces special veteran plates issued on or after that date. new text end